Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4615.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 13. Maintenance and support. A guardian shall not apply any portion of the estate of his the guardian's ward for the support and maintenance of any person individual other than said the ward, his the ward's minor children, and, his wife (if she if the ward's spouse and the ward be are living together) together, the ward's spouse, except upon petition to and order of the court after a hearing, notice of which has been given to the proper office of the veterans administration in the manner and within the time provided in as required by section 9. of this act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.